Hawaii statutes.
part XV. RECORDS AND REPORTS

[§414D-301] Corporate records. (a) A
corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its
members and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the members or
directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by committees of
the board of directors as authorized by section 414D‑148(d).

(b) A corporation shall maintain appropriate
accounting records.

(c) A corporation or its agent shall maintain
a record of its members in a form that permits preparation of a list of the
name and address of all members, in alphabetical order by class, showing the
number of votes each member is entitled to cast.

(d) A corporation shall maintain its records
in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form
within a reasonable time.

(e) A corporation shall keep a copy of the
following records at its principal office:

(1) Articles or restated articles of incorporation
and all amendments to them currently in effect;

(2) Bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to
them currently in effect;

(3) Resolutions adopted by its board of directors
relating to the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and
obligations of members or any class or category of members;

(4) Minutes of all meetings of members and records of
all actions approved by the members for the past three years;

(5) All written financial statements furnished for
the past three years under section 414D‑306;

(6) A list of the names and business or home
addresses of its current directors and officers; and

(7) The most recent annual report delivered to the
department director under section 414D‑308. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next